Louisiana, session 2026, HB10.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 1:55(E)(1)(j) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§55. Days of public rest, legal holidays, and half-holidays
* * *
E.(1)
* * *
(j) In addition, in the parish of Acadia, the Friday of the International Rice
Festival shall be a legal holiday for the purpose of authorizing the clerk of court in
the parish of Acadia to close offices in observance of that day, unless there are
functions and duties related to an election that require the office to remain open.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.